District of Columbia statutes.
47-3506.01

Resident management corporations — Qualifications; exemptions.

(a)

In order to qualify for an exemption under this section, a resident management corporation shall meet the requirements of section 20 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. § 1437r).

(b)

Real property transferred to a qualifying resident management corporation pursuant, to section 21 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437s), shall be exempt from:

(1)

The deed recordation tax pursuant to § 42-1102;

(2)

The transfer tax pursuant to § 47-902; and

(3)

The real property tax pursuant to § 47-1002, through the end of the 10th tax year following the year in which the property is transferred to the resident management corporation.

(c)

This section shall apply to real property transferred to all qualifying resident management corporations on, before, or after June 11, 1992. Any taxes owed by a qualifying resident management corporation prior to the enactment of the Public Housing Homeownership Tax Abatement Amendment Act of 1992, which are exempted by the Public Housing Homeownership Tax Abatement Amendment Act of 1992, shall be forgiven. Any taxes paid by a qualifying resident management corporation prior to the enactment of the Public Housing Homeownership Tax Abatement Amendment Act of 1992, which are exempted by the Public Housing Homeownership Tax Abatement Amendment Act of 1992, shall be refunded.

Oct. 8, 1983, D.C. Law 5-31, § 7a
as added June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-120, § 2, 39 DCR 3195
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 5 of D.C. Law 9-120 provided that the Mayor may issue rules to implement the provisions of the act.
The “Public Housing Homeownership Tax Abatement Amendment Act of 1992,” referred to in four places in (c), is D.C. Law 9-120, codified as §§ 34-2413.02, 34-2105.05, 42-1102, 47-902, 47-1002 and this section.
1981 Ed., § 47-3506.1.
This section is referenced in § 42-1102, § 47-902, and § 47-1002.
Real property transfer tax, exempt transfers, see § 47-902.
Real property exempt from taxation, enumerated, see § 47-1002.
Deeds, recordation tax, exempt deeds, see § 42-1102.